Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1368XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 128 Section 1. MEDICAL EXAMINER INVESTIGATION FORM FOR 1 CHILD DEATHS AGE ZERO TO THREE ââ INFORMATION REGARDING 2 IMMUNIZATIONS. 3 1. The report used by medical examiners for investigations 4 of infants zero to three years of age shall include a request 5 for information regarding the date and type of the decedentâs 6 last immunization. If the decedent received more than 7 one immunization at the time of the last immunization, the 8 information provided shall include all types of immunizations 9 received. 10 2. The state medical examiner shall adopt rules pursuant to 11 chapter 17A to comply with this section. 12